lt-LT: Traukinių modeliukų valdymo technologija: Analoginis; Skaitmeninė; Belaidis; Kita
tr: Model kontrol teknolojisi: Analog; Dijital; Kablosuz; Diğer
hu: Modellvezérlési technológia: Analóg; Digitális; Vezeték nélküli; Egyéb
ja: 模型制御技術: アナログ; デジタル; 無線; その他
hr-HR: Tehnologija upravljanja modelima: Analogni; Digitalni; Bežični; Ostalo
sv: Modellstyrningsteknik: Analog; Digital; Trådlös; Övrigt
en: Model control technology: Analog; Digital; Wireless; Other
cs: Technologie ovládání modelů: Analogový; Digitální; Bezdrátové; Jiné
it: Tecnologia di controllo del modello: Analog; Digital; Senza fili; Altro
ru: Технология управления моделью: Аналоговые; Цифровой; Беспроводной; Другой
zh-TW: 模型控制技術: 類比; 數位; 無線; 其他
pt-PT: Tecnologia de controlo de modelo: Analógico; Digital; Sem fios; Outro
nl: Modelbedieningstechnologie: Analoog; Digitaal; Draadloos; Andere
zh-CN: 模型控制技术: 模拟; 数字化; 无线; 其他
es: Tecnología de control de modelo: Analógico; Digital; Inalámbrico; Otros
pl: Technologia sterowania modelem: Analogowy; Cyfrowe; Bezprzewodowy; Inne
ko: 모델 제어 기술: 아날로그; 디지털; 무선; 기타
sl-SI: Tehnologija nadzora modela: Analogna; Digitalno; Brezžično; Drugo
ro-RO: Tehnologia de control al modelului: Analogic; Digital; Fără sârmă; Altele
nb: Modellkontrollteknologi: Analog; Digital; Trådløs; Annet
el: Τεχνολογία ελέγχου μοντέλου: Αναλογικό; Ψηφιακός; Χωρίς μπανέλα; Άλλο
pt-BR: Tecnologia de controle de modelo: Analógico; Digital; Sem fio; Outro
bg-BG: Технология за контрол на модела: Аналогов; Цифров; Безжичен; Други
fr: Technologie de contrôle des modèles: Analogique; Numérique; Sans fil; Autre
de: Modellsteuerungstechnik: Analog; Digital; Kabellos; Sonstiges
sk-SK: Technológia riadenia modelu: Analógový; Digitálny; Bezdrôtový; Iné
fi: Malliohjaustekniikka: Analoginen; Digitaalinen; Langattomat; Muu
th: เทคโนโลยีการควบคุมโมเดล: อนาล็อก; ดิจิทัล; แบบไร้สาย; อื่นๆ
vi: Công nghệ điều khiển mô hình: Analog; Kỹ thuật số; Không dây; Khác
da: Modelstyringsteknologi: Analog; Digital; Trådløs; Andet